Montana, session 2025, SB183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 37-47-303, MCA, is amended to read:
"37-47-303. Guide's qualifications. (1) An applicant for a guide's license must:
(1)(a) be 18 years of age or older and be physically capable and mentally competent to perform the
duties of a guide;
(2)(b) be endorsed and recommended by an outfitter with a valid license, unless otherwise qualified
under guide standards established by the board pursuant to 37-47-201(4) unless otherwise qualified under
guide standards established by the board pursuant to 37-47-201(4); and
(3)(c) have been issued a valid conservation license.
(2) An application for renewal of a guide license must be signed by an outfitter employing a guide.
If the application for renewal is not signed as required by this subsection, the application must be denied."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 183
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 183
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 183
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 183, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 183
INTRODUCED BY G. HERTZ, J. SECKINGER, E. ALBUS
AN ACT REQUIRING AN OUTFITTER ENDORSEMENT FOR GUIDE LICENSURE; AMENDING SECTION 37-
47-303, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”